District of Columbia statutes.
26-1213

Federal exclusion.

This chapter shall not be construed to:

(1)

Grant the Superintendent [Commissioner] or any other District agency jurisdiction over a federal association or any merger or consolidation of a federal association in which an association chartered by the District is not a party; or

(2)

Subject any federal association to any law or rule of the District or its agencies to which it is not otherwise subject.

Oct. 12, 1988, D.C. Law 7-175, § 14, 35 DCR 6133
1981 Ed., § 26-913.